District of Columbia statutes.
47-2103

Purchase of new stocks for use on “closing-out sales” prohibited; presumption.

No person in contemplation of a closing-out sale shall order any goods, wares, or merchandise for the purpose of selling and disposing of the same at such sale, and any unusual purchase and additions to the stock of such goods, wares, or merchandise within 60 days prior to the filing of application for a license to conduct such sale shall be presumptive evidence that such purchases and additions to stock were made in contemplation of such sale.

Sept. 1, 1959, 73 Stat. 450, Pub. L. 86-219, § 3
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(pp)(2), 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 47-2103.
1973 Ed., § 47-3003.